Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3517
Board; duties; department; duties.

(1) The board shall, pursuant to section 38-126: (a) Recommend to the department the issuance of licenses to practice surgical assisting under the Surgical First Assistant Practice Act; (b) investigate and adopt standards based on national standards for surgical assisting and implement changes as needed to carry out the act; and (c) provide for distribution of information regarding practice of licensed surgical first assistants.

(2) The department shall: (a) Receive and investigate complaints, conduct hearings, and impose disciplinary actions in relation to complaints against licensed surgical first assistants under the Uniform Credentialing Act; and (b) perform other duties as required under the Surgical First Assistant Practice Act and Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 2016, LB721, § 17.